District of Columbia statutes.
38-1111

Construction of §§ 38-1107 and 38-1109.

Sections 38-1107 and 38-1109 provide that the Washington Technical Institute shall be considered to be a college established for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts in accordance with the provisions of the Act of July 2, 1862, for the purpose of enabling the Washington Technical Institute to share, under § 38-1110, with the Federal City College:

(1)

Grants under the acts referred to in § 38-1107;

(2)

Grants under § 38-1109(b); and

(3)

Earnings of sums appropriated under § 38-1108.

History

Nov. 7, 1966, Pub. L. 89-791, title I, § 111
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1936, Pub. L. 91-650, title IV, § 401(c)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1411.
1973 Ed., § 31-1611.

References in Text

“The Act of July 2, 1862,” referred to in this section, is known as the First Morrill Act and is codified in 7 U.S.C. §§ 301 to 305, 307, and 308.